North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55D. Filings, Names, and Registered Agents for Corporations, Nonprofit Corporations, and Partnerships.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 55D-1.
Applicable definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

“Corporation” or “domestic corporation” is defined in G.S. 55-1-40(4).

“Deliver” is defined in G.S. 55-1-40(5).

“Entity” is defined in G.S. 55-1-40(9).

“Foreign corporation” is defined in G.S. 55-1-40(10).

“Foreign limited liability company” has the same meaning as the term “foreign LLC” in

G.S. 57D-1-03

.

(5a)

“Foreign limited liability limited partnership” is defined in G.S. 59-102(4c).

“Foreign limited liability partnership” is defined in G.S. 59-32(4g).

“Foreign limited partnership” is defined in G.S. 59-102(5).

“Foreign nonprofit corporation” means a foreign corporation as defined in G.S. 55A-1-40(11).

“Individual” is defined in G.S. 55-1-40(13).

“Limited liability company” or “domestic limited liability company” has the same meaning as the term “LLC” in

G.S. 57D-1-03

.

“Limited liability limited partnership” is defined in G.S. 59-102(6a).

“Limited liability partnership” or “registered limited liability partnership” means a registered limited liability partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-32(7)

.

“Limited partnership” or “domestic limited partnership” is defined in G.S. 59-102(8).

“Nonprofit corporation” or “domestic nonprofit corporation” means a corporation as defined in G.S. 55A-1-40(5).

“Person” is defined in G.S. 55-1-40(16).

History.

2001-358, s. 1; 2001-387, ss. 161, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2013-157, s. 6.

§§ 55D-2 through 55D-4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 55D-5.
Rule-making authority.

The Secretary of State may adopt rules to implement the Secretary of State’s responsibilities under this Chapter.

History.

2001-358, s. 1; 2001-387, s. 173; 2001-413, s. 6.

§§ 55D-6 through 55D-9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.